Simple_FST/TrMorph.foma
### TrMorph.foma ###

read lexc TrMorph.lexc
define Lexicon;

# kelimenin sonuna i gelme hali
define theWordRootMutationİ p -> b, ç -> c, t -> d, k -> ğ || _ "^"i ;
# kelimenin sonuna ı gelme hali
define theWordRootMutationI p -> b, ç -> c, t -> d, k -> ğ || _ "^"ı ;
# kelimenin sonuna u gelme hali
define theWordRootMutationU p -> b, ç -> c, t -> d, k -> ğ || _ "^"u ;
# kelimenin sonuna ü gelme hali
define theWordRootMutationÜ p -> b, ç -> c, t -> d, k -> ğ || _ "^"ü ;
# Cleanup 
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

read lexc TrMorph.lexc
define Lexicon

define Grammar Lexicon .o.
			   theWordRootMutationİ .o.
			   theWordRootMutationI .o.
			   theWordRootMutationU .o.
			   theWordRootMutationÜ .o.
			   Cleanup;
			   
regex Grammar;
